Florida, session 2026, HB647.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section
121.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
121.055 Senior Management Service Class.—There is hereby
established a separate class of membership within the Florida
Retirement System to be known as the "Senior Management Service
Class," which shall become effective February 1, 1987.
(1)
(h)1.a. Except as provided in subparagraph 3., effective
January 1, 1994, participation in the Senior Management Service
Class shall be compulsory for the State Courts Administrator and
the Deputy State Courts Administrators, the Clerk of the Supreme
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb647-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 647 2026
Court, the Marshal of the Supreme Court, the Executive Director
of the Justice Administrative Commission, the capital collateral
regional counsel, the clerks of the district courts of appeals,
the marshals of the district courts of appeals, and the trial
court administrator and the Chief Deputy Court Administrator in
each judicial circuit. Effective July 1, 2026, participation in
the Senior Management Service Class shall be compulsory for up
to an additional 235 non-judicial managerial or policymaking
positions within the judicial branch, as selected by the Chief
Justice of the Supreme Court.
b. Effective July 1, 2026, participation in the Senior
Management Service Class shall be compulsory for the Executive
Director and the General Counsel of the Florida Judicial
Qualifications Commission.
c. Effective January 1, 1994, additional positions in the
offices of the state attorney and public defender in each
judicial circuit may be designated for inclusion in the Senior
Management Service Class of the Florida Retirement System,
provided that:
(I)a. Positions to be included in the class shall be
designated by the state attorney or public defender, as
appropriate. Notice of intent to designate positions for
inclusion in the class shall be published for at least 2
consecutive weeks on a publicly accessible website as provided
in s. 50.0311 or, if published in print, once a week for 2
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb647-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 647 2026
consecutive weeks in a newspaper qualified under chapter 50 in
the county or counties affected.
(II)b. One nonelective full-time position may be
designated for each state attorney and public defender reporting
to the Department of Management Services; for agencies with 200
or more regularly established positions under the state attorney
or public defender, additional nonelective full-time positions
may be designated, not to exceed 0.5 percent of the regularly
established positions within the agency.
(III)c. Each position added to the class must be a
managerial or policymaking position filled by an employee who
serves at the pleasure of the state attorney or public defender
without civil service protection, and who:
(A)(I) Heads an organizational unit; or
(B)(II) Has responsibility to effect or recommend
personnel, budget, expenditure, or policy decisions in his or
her areas of responsibility.
2. Participation in this class shall be compulsory, except
as provided in subparagraph 3., for any judicial employee who
holds a position designated for coverage in the Senior
Management Service Class, and such participation shall continue
until the employee terminates employment in a covered position.
Effective January 1, 2001, participation in this class is
compulsory for assistant state attorneys, assistant statewide
prosecutors, assistant public defenders, and assistant capital
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb647-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 647 2026
collateral regional counsel. Effective January 1, 2002,
participation in this class is compulsory for assistant
attorneys general.
3. In lieu of participation in the Senior Management
Service Class, such members, excluding assistant state
attorneys, assistant public defenders, assistant statewide
prosecutors, assistant attorneys general, and assistant capital
collateral regional counsel, may participate in the Senior
Management Service Optional Annuity Program as established in
subsection (6).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb647-00